Massachusetts, session 194th, H1538.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There shall be a special commission established to study condominium law,
relative to: owner’s rights, association and management responsibilities to owners, independent
audits of accounts held for improvements, upgrades, and maintenance, oversight authority for the
development of regulations by an appropriate state office or agency, and any other matters
relevant to this subject. This special sub-committee shall meet and may hold hearings and invite
testimony from experts and the public to help generate a report to the House and Senate no later
than January 1, 2027 which shall proffer recommendations to establish future condominium
regulations and statute. The committee shall consist of seven members, two each appointed by
the Speaker of the House and the Senate President and three appointed by the Governor, one of
whom shall be the Chair, and must include at least the following individuals:
An attorney (1) who specializes in condominium law and whose client base is comprised
mostly (over 51%) of condo unit owners, unit owner groups or aggrieved unit owners and whose
of 3

client base is not comprised mostly of Property Management companies and/or condo Boards of
Trustees.
An individual condo unit owner who is not a member of their Board of Trustees
A Certified Property Manager who possesses either the PCAM, CMCA and/or the AMS
designation.
Areas that shall be explored by the committee and for which subsequent
recommendations should be developed include (but are not limited to):
Board of Trustee meetings, including the procedures and elections thereto;
Annual Meetings
Unit Owner’s rights and enforcement
Association and management responsibilities to owners
Independent audits of accounts held for improvements, upgrades, and maintenance
Distribution of information, documents and meeting minutes by the Management
company or Board members, to unit owners
How condo fees are determined and are increased
Oversight authority for the development of regulations by an appropriate state office or
agency
Formal process to mediate/resolve Unit Owner and Board disputes
Rules and Regulations, fees, fines and assessments
of 3

Any other matters relevant to this subject.
of 3